District of Columbia statutes.
21-105

Appointment by deed or will for child inheriting from parent.

(a)

In case of the death of either parent from whom his or her minor children inherit or take by devise or bequest, the parent may by deed or last will and testament appoint a guardian of the property of the children, subject to the approval of the proper court of the District of Columbia.

(b)

This section does not limit or affect the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to appoint another person guardian of the children when it appears to the court that the welfare of the children requires it.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-105.
1973 Ed., § 21-105.